Arkansas, session 2025, HB1996.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Part-time work by teenagers teaches important lessons in
personal finance, time management, and confidence and allows for important
networking and career exploration opportunities;
(2) However, the state has a responsibility to protect children
from hazardous work environments and ensure that employment opportunities do
not come at the expense of a teenager’s education;
(3) The Department of Labor and Licensing identified that, from
2020 to 2023, child labor violations increased by two hundred sixty-six
*CRH331*
04/07/2025 7:13:40 AM CRH331

HB1996
percent (266%) and financial penalties for child labor violations increased
by six hundred percent (600%) for the same time;
(4) When compared to surrounding states, Arkansas has some of
the highest numbers of child labor cases investigated and child labor
violations, as well as financial penalties assigned, according to data from
the United States Department of Labor Wage and Hour Division; and
(5) It is crucial for teenagers who are employed, as well as
employers and parents, to understand legal requirements and regulations as it
relates to allowable working hours and places of employment for children
under the age of sixteen (16).

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 11-6-103(a)(1), concerning the civil penalty
related to child labor violations as enacted by Initiated Act 1 of 1914, is
amended to read as follows:
(a)(1)(A) Any person, firm, corporation, partnership, association,
parent, guardian, or custodian who employs or permits or suffers any child to
be employed or to work in violation of this subchapter or §§ 11-12-101 — 11-
12-105, or any rules issued thereunder, shall be subject to a civil penalty
of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than five thousand
dollars ($5,000) for each violation.
(B) A civil penalty under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this
section may be waived for a first-time violation if the person, firm,
corporation, partnership, association, parent, guardian, or custodian subject
to the civil penalty completes an educational module developed by the
Department of Labor and Licensing under § 11-6-117.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 11, Chapter 6, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add additional sections to read as follows:
11-6-117. Educational module related to child labor.
(a) The Department of Labor and Licensing shall develop an educational
module that shall be provided to a person, a firm, a corporation, a
partnership, an association, a parent, a guardian, or a custodian subject to
a first-time civil penalty under §11-6-103(a)(1)(B).
(b) The educational module under subsection (a) of this section shall
include:
(1) The requirements and prohibitions of the Fair Labor
04/07/2025 7:13:40 AM CRH331

HB1996
Standards Act of 1938, 29 U.S.C. § 201, et seq., as it existed on January 1,
2025, specific to the employment of children under sixteen (16) years of age;
(2) Regulations under 29 C.F.R. Part 570, as it existed on
January 1, 2025, specific to the employment of children under sixteen (16)
years of age; and
(3) All state laws and rules governing the employment of
children under sixteen (16) years of age.

11-6-118. Posting of educational signage.
(a) Each public school, open-enrollment public charter school, and
private school shall post in a conspicuous place near the entrance of the
establishment, or where posters and notices of this type customarily are
posted, a poster developed by the Department of Labor and Licensing in
collaboration with the Department of Education.
(b) The poster shall:
(1) Measure at least eight and one-half inches by eleven inches
(8 1/2" and 11") in size;
(2) Be in a youth-friendly format and utilize age-appropriate
language;
(3) Include the requirements and prohibitions of the Fair Labor
Standards Act of 1938, 29 U.S.C. § 201, et seq., as it existed on January 1,
2025, specific to the employment of children under the age of sixteen (16);
(4) Include regulations under 29 C.F.R. Part 570, as it existed
on January 1, 2025, specific to the employment of children under the age of
sixteen (16); and
(5) Provide information on all state laws and rules governing
the employment of children under the age of sixteen (16).
(c) The information required in subsection (b) of this section shall
be printed in English, Spanish, and any other language mandated by the Voting
Rights Act of 1965, 52 U.S.C. § 10503, as it existed on January 1, 2025, in
the county where the school is located.
(d) The poster required under this section shall be available on the
websites of the following:
(1) The Department of Labor and Licensing; and
(2) The Department of Education.
(e) To obtain a copy of the poster required under this section, the
04/07/2025 7:13:40 AM CRH331

HB1996
administration of the public school, open-enrollment public charter school,
or private school shall:
(1) Print the poster from either of the websites listed under
subsection (c) of this section; or
(2) Request that the poster be mailed by the Department of Labor
and Licensing or the Department of Education for the cost of printing and
first-class postage.





























04/07/2025 7:13:40 AM CRH331